Maryland, session 2026, HB1526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
2–202.
(a) There is a Class 1 distillery license.
(e) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, a license holder may conduct the
activities specified in subsections (c)(5) and (i)(2) of this section from 10 a.m. to 10 p.m. each
day.
– 1 –

Ch. 836 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) (1) A local licensing board may grant an on–site consumption permit for
use at the location of the Class 1 distillery license to a holder of a Class 1 distillery license.
(2) (i) The permit authorizes the holder to sell mixed drinks made from
liquor that the holder produces that is mixed with other nonalcoholic ingredients for
on–premises consumption.
(ii) The holder may not use more than an aggregate of 7,750 gallons
annually of liquor the holder produces for mixed drinks sold under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph.
(3) A local licensing board:
(i) may establish and charge a permit fee; and
(ii) shall require the permit holder to:
1. comply with the alcohol awareness requirements under §
4–505 of this article; and
2. abide by all applicable trade practice restrictions.
16–102.
This title applies only in Carroll County.
16–401.
(a) The following sections of Title 2, Subtitle 2 (“Manufacturer’s Licenses”) of
Division I of this article apply in the county without exception or variation:
(1) § 2–201 (“Issuance by Comptroller”);
(2) [§ 2–202 (“Class 1 distillery license”);
(3)] § 2–203 (“Class 9 limited distillery license”);
[(4)] (3) § 2–204 (“Class 2 rectifying license”);
[(5)] (4) § 2–205 (“Class 3 winery license”);
[(6)] (5) § 2–207 (“Class 5 brewery license”);
[(7)] (6) § 2–210 (“Class 8 farm brewery license”);
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 836
[(8)] (7) § 2–211 (“Residency requirement”);
[(9)] (8) § 2–212 (“Additional licenses”);
[(10)] (9) § 2–213 (“Additional fees”);
[(11)] (10) § 2–214 (“Sale or delivery restricted”);
[(12)] (11) § 2–216 (“Interaction between manufacturing entities and
retailers”);
[(13)] (12) § 2–217 (“Distribution of alcoholic beverages — Prohibited
practices”); and
[(14)] (13) § 2–218 (“Restrictive agreements between producers and
retailers — Prohibited”).
(b) Section 2–215 (“Beer sale on credit to retail dealer prohibited”) of Division I of
this article does not apply in the county.
(c) The following sections of Title 2, Subtitle 2 (“Manufacturer’s Licenses”) of
Division I of this article apply in the county:
(1) § 2–202 (“CLASS 1 DISTILLERY LICENSE”), SUBJECT TO § 16–406
OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) § 2–206 (“Class 4 limited winery license”), subject to § 16–403 of this
subtitle;
[(2)] (3) § 2–208 (“Class 6 pub–brewery license”), subject to § 16–404 of
this subtitle; and
[(3)] (4) § 2–209 (“Class 7 micro–brewery license”), subject to § 16–405 of
this subtitle.
16–406.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS 1 DISTILLERY ON–SITE CONSUMPTION PERMIT.
(B) THE PERMIT MAY BE ISSUED TO A HOLDER OF A CLASS 1 DISTILLERY
LICENSE.
(C) THE PERMIT SERVES AS THE ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION PERMIT
REQUIRED UNDER § 2–202(E) AND (I) OF THIS ARTICLE.
– 3 –

Ch. 836 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) (1) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL, PREPARE, AND
SERVE:
(1) (I) FOOD;
(2) (II) NONALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; AND
(3) (III) ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES, INCLUDING BRANDY, RUM,
WHISKEY, AND NEUTRAL SPIRITS THAT ARE DISTILLED, RECTIFIED, BLENDED, AND
BOTTLED AT THE DISTILLERY FOR ON– AND OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION TO THE
EXTENT THE PERMIT HOLDER IS AUTHORIZED UNDER THE CLASS 1 DISTILLERY
LICENSE.
(E) (2) THE AUTHORIZATION TO SELL, PREPARE, AND SERVE FOOD AND
NONALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES UNDER THIS SECTION SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO
APPROVAL BY THE CARROLL COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
(E) (1) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO USE THE LICENSED
PREMISES FOR EVENTS.
(2) ANY ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AT
AN EVENT HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) AN APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
A DIAGRAM OF THE PROPOSED AREA FOR CONSUMPTION UNDER THE PERMIT AND
SHOW CLEAR DELINEATION FROM THE MANUFACTURING AND PROCESSING
FACILITIES.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION
AND TO SET THE ANNUAL PERMIT FEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –